Utah statutes.
32B-6-304.   Specific licensing requirements for limited-service restaurant license.

(1)  To obtain a limited-service restaurant license a person shall comply with Chapter 5, Part 2, Retail Licensing Process.

(2) (a)  A limited-service restaurant license expires on October 31 of each year.

(b)  To renew a person's limited-service restaurant license, a person shall comply with the renewal requirements of Chapter 5, Part 2, Retail Licensing Process, by no later than September 30.

(3) (a)  The nonrefundable application fee for a limited-service restaurant license is $330.

(b)  The initial license fee for a limited-service restaurant license is $825.

(c)  The renewal fee for a limited-service restaurant license is $605.

(4)  The bond amount required for a limited-service restaurant license is the penal sum of $5,000.

